Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.115

Statement of denial.

A partner, or other person named as a partner in a filed statement of partnership authority, may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of denial stating the name of the partnership and the fact that is being denied, which may include denial of a person's authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial is a limitation on authority as provided in RCW 25.05.110 (2) and (3).

[ 2015 c 176 s 5104; 1998 c 103 s 304.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.